Hawaii statutes.
[§662-17] Benefits and obligations of
parents of minor employees. All benefits and obligations conferred or
imposed upon employees of the State by this chapter are conferred or imposed
upon the parents or legal guardians of the employee when the employee is a
minor. [L 1988, c 174, §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next